Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1918.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 105. Prohibiting the receipt of compensation with regard to veterans' benefits.(a) Prohibitions.--A person shall not: (1) Receive compensation for preparing, presenting, prosecuting, advising, consulting or assisting any individual with regard to any veterans' benefits matter, except as permitted under Federal law.(2) Receive compensation for referring an individual to another person to prepare, present, prosecute, advise, consult or assist the individual with any veterans' benefits 123456789101112131415161718 matter.(3) Receive any compensation for any services rendered before the date on which a notice of disagreement is filed with respect to the individual's case.(4) Guarantee, either directly or by implication, that an individual is certain to receive specific veterans' benefits or that an individual is certain to receive a specific level, percentage or amount of veterans' benefits.(5) Receive excessive or unreasonable fees as compensation for advising or assisting any individual with any veterans' benefits matter. The factors in 38 CFR 14.636 (relating to payment of fees for representation by agents and attorneys in proceedings before Agencies of Original Jurisdiction and before the Board of Veterans' Appeals) as of the effective date of this paragraph shall govern determinations of whether a fee is excessive or unreasonable.(b) Transparency.--A person seeking to receive compensation for preparing, presenting, prosecuting, advising, consulting or assisting an individual with any veterans' benefits matter shall, before rendering any services, memorialize all terms regarding the individual's payment of fees for services rendered in a written agreement, signed by both parties, that adheres to criteria specified within 38 CFR 14.636.(c) Grading.--A violation of this section shall be an unlawful practice and a misdemeanor of the third degree.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Compensation." Payment of any money, thing of value or financial benefit.20250HB1918PN2401 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Person." An individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency or instrumentality or any other legal or commercial entity."Veterans' benefits matter." The preparation, presentation or prosecution of a claim affecting an individual who has filed or expresses an intent to file a claim for a benefit, program, service, commodity, function or status or entitlement to which is determined under the laws and regulations administered by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or the United States Department of Defense pertaining to veterans, a veteran's dependents, a veteran's survivors or any other individual eligible for the benefits.Section 2. The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1918PN2401 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920